District of Columbia statutes.
44-1709

Advisory committee.

The Mayor may appoint an advisory committee to advise the Mayor in respect to any matter related to the enforcement of this chapter, and the members thereof shall serve without compensation. Such committee shall consist of not less than 5 nor more than 9 members, whose terms shall be fixed by the Mayor. The Mayor is authorized to assign an employee of the District of Columbia to serve as secretary for the committee.

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 281, Pub. L. 85-87, § 10
1981 Ed., § 2-709.
1973 Ed., § 2-2109.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.